California, session 20252026, AB2178.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 78078) is added to Chapter 1 of Part 48 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code, to read: Article 6.5. Juvenile Justice Education Access and Equity Act78078. This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the Juvenile Justice Education Access and Equity Act.78079. (a) For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:(1)“Eligible institution” means an accredited community college authorized to enter into instructional services agreements under state law.(2)(1) “Home community college district” means the community college district assigned to serve the geographic service area in which the juvenile justice facility is located.(3)(2) “Instructional services agreement” means an agreement to provide academic or career technical education courses to a juvenile justice facility.(4)(3) “Juvenile justice facility” means a juvenile hall, youth correctional center, or camp operated by a county probation department.(5)“Non-home community college district” means a community college district not assigned to serve the geographic area in which the juvenile justice facility is located.(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a A home community college district, or an eligible institution associated with a college that is part of the home community college district, may enter into an instructional services agreement with a county probation department.(c)Notwithstanding any other law, a non-home community college district, or an eligible institution associated with the non-home community college district, may enter into an instructional services agreement with a county probation department if the home community college district and all eligible institutions associated with the home community college district are unable, unwilling, or fail to provide requested academic or career technical education courses at a juvenile justice facility within 90 days of a written request from the administrator of the juvenile justice facility.(c) A county probation department and a community college district outside of the home community college district, or a college that is part of the community college district outside of the home community college district, may enter into an instructional services agreement if the home community college district has declined a request from the county probation department, or has failed to take action within 60 calendar days of a request by the county probation department, to either:(1) Enter into an instructional services agreement to provide the requested instructional services, courses, or programs.(2) Approve the community college district outside of the home community college district, or a college that is part of the community college district outside of the home community college district, to enter into an instructional services agreement to provide those instructional services, courses, or programs.(d) Upon occurrence of the conditions described in subdivision (c), the home community college district and an eligible institution associated with the home community college district or a college that is part of the home community college district shall not prohibit, block, or otherwise interfere with the ability of the non-home the community college district, district outside of the home community college district, or an eligible institution associated with the non-home a college that is part of that community college district outside of the home community college district, to provide instruction at the juvenile justice facility.(e) This article shall not be interpreted to: (1) Prevent the home community college district, or an eligible institution associated with the home a college that is part of the community college district, from continuing to offer its own courses.(2) Grant exclusive instructional rights to a non-home community college district outside of the home community college district or an eligible institution associated with the non-home a college that is part of that community college district. district outside of the home community college district.(3) Eliminate requirements to comply with applicable instructional services agreement, apportionment, academic, or reporting requirements.(f) This article shall only be interpreted to expand access to postsecondary education for justice-involved youth when existing delivery mechanisms fail to meet documented needs. This article shall not be construed to restructure community college governance, modify community college district service areas, or alter statewide apportionment policy.